apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
     <pardef n="profanacj/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>i</l>
           <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
       <e>
         <p>
           <l>o</l>
           <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
         </p>
       </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gad/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mu/ł__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ł</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ła</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>łowi</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>łem</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ły</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>łów</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>łom</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>łami</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>łach</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ła</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ły</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ły</l>
          <r>ł<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tur/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="profanacja"><i>profanacj</i><par n="profanacj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gad"><i>gad</i><par n="gad/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muł"><i>mu</i><par n="mu/ł__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tur"><i>tur</i><par n="tur/__n"/></e>
